Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0306

Restated articles of organization.

A limited cooperative association, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the board of directors taken at a meeting for which the purpose is stated in the notice of the meeting, may adopt restated articles of organization that contain the original articles as previously amended. Restated articles may contain amendments if the restated articles are adopted in the same manner and with the same vote as required for amendments to the articles under RCW 23.100.0305(1). Upon filing, restated articles supersede the existing articles and all amendments.

[ 2019 c 37 s 306.]